Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB27.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1752-A. Cyber charter school moratorium.Beginning July 1, 2025, and continuing through June 30, 2038, the department may not review or act on any application for the establishment of a new cyber charter school regardless of the date on which the application was or is received by the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.123456789101112131415161718